Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB662.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "department" in section 103 of the act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act, is amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Department." The Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection of the Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1303.1. Release testing and reimbursement.(a) Release testing.--Release from identified contaminated sites shall be tested annually by the person that owns the site, including releases of hazardous substances expressly and specifically approved under a valid Federal or State permit.(b) Reimbursement.--An owner of an identified contaminated site shall reimburse the department as provided for in section 507.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Identified contaminated site." A site which contains hazardous or dangerous substances at levels above normal background levels which pose a risk to human health or the environment, including Federal Superfund sites.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0662PN0700 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920